Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Alaska Police Standards Council.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska police standards council, see 13 AAC, part 6.

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S., States, § 252.

Sec. 18.65.130.
Policy.

The administration of criminal justice affects the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state and requires education and training of a professional quality. It is a primary public interest that applicants meet minimum standards for employment as police officers, probation and parole officers, and correctional officers, and that criminal justice education and training be made available to police officers, probation and parole officers, and correctional officers serving in a probationary capacity and police officers, probation and parole officers, and correctional officers already in regular service. It is of secondary public interest to encourage the establishment of preliminary training programs for persons seeking to become police officers, probation and parole officers, and correctional officers. Application of standards for employment and making education and training available for municipal correctional officers is also in the public interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 126 SLA 1998)

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no provision in the Alaska Statutes or the Alaska Constitution which would operate to deprive the commissioner of fish and game of his authority to deputize peace officers under AS

16.05.150

.
However, there is nothing to prevent the governor, as a matter of state policy, from subjecting Department of Fish and Game personnel to the qualifications and standards adopted by the Alaska Police Standards Council under AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

or from otherwise limiting the commissioner’s deputization power.
March 29, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.65.140.
Creation.

There is created in the Department of Public Safety the Alaska Police Standards Council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 45 § 2 (1980))

Sec. 18.65.150.
Composition of council.

The council consists of the following persons:

four chief administrative officers or chiefs of police of local governments;

the commissioner of public safety or a designee of the commissioner;

the commissioner of corrections or a designee of the commissioner;

two persons, each of whom has been certified for five years or more by the council under this chapter, one of whom serves as a police officer and one of whom serves as a probation officer, parole officer, municipal correctional officer, or correctional officer;

one correctional administrative officer who is employed at the level of a deputy director or higher; and

four members of the public at large with at least two from the communities of 2,500 population or less.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision relating to the terms of the two persons to be initially appointed under AS

18.65.150

(4), as added by the 2008 amendment of this section, see § 2, ch. 109, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.65.160.
Appointment.

The commissioner of public safety or a designee and the commissioner of corrections or a designee shall serve during each commissioner’s continuance in office. Other members of the council shall be appointed by the governor for staggered terms of four years, except that a member may not serve beyond the time the member holds the office that established eligibility for appointment.
A vacancy on the council shall be filled for the remainder of a member’s unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 112 SLA 1988)

Sec. 18.65.170.
Chairman and vice chairman.

The council shall select its chairman and vice chairman annually.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.65.180.
Holding another office.

Membership on the council does not disqualify a member from holding any other public office or employment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.65.190.
Compensation and expenses.

The members of the council receive no salary, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.65.200.
Meetings.

The council shall meet at least twice a year. The chairman shall set the time and place of the meeting, either on the chairman’s own motion or on written request by any three members of the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972)

Sec. 18.65.210.
Reports.
[Repealed, § 12 ch 19 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 18.65.220.
Powers.

The council has the power to

adopt regulations for the administration of AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

;

establish minimum standards for employment as a police officer, probation officer, parole officer, municipal correctional officer, and correctional officer in a permanent or probationary position and certify persons to be qualified as police officers, probation officers, parole officers, municipal correctional officers, and correctional officers under AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

;

establish minimum criminal justice curriculum requirements for basic, specialized, and in-service courses and programs for schools operated by or for the state or a political subdivision of the state for the specific purpose of training police recruits, police officers, probation officers, parole officers, municipal correctional officers, and correctional officers; the curriculum requirements established under this paragraph must include training in

recognizing persons with disabilities;

appropriate interactions with persons with disabilities;

resources available to persons with disabilities and to those interacting with persons with disabilities; and

the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 12131 — 12165 (Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990);

consult and cooperate with municipalities, agencies of the state, other governmental agencies, universities, colleges, and other institutions concerning the development of police officer, probation officer, parole officer, municipal correctional officer, and correctional officer training schools and programs of criminal justice instruction;

employ an administrator and other persons necessary to carry out its duties under AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

;

investigate when there is reason to believe that a police officer, probation officer, parole officer, municipal correctional officer, or correctional officer does not meet the minimum standards for employment; in connection with the investigation the council may subpoena persons, books, records, or documents related to the investigation and require answers in writing under oath to questions asked by the council or the administrator;

charge and collect a fee of $50 for processing applications for certification of police, probation, parole, municipal correctional, and correctional officers;

require a state and national criminal history record check for an applicant to a training program established in AS

18.65.230

and for a person to be certified as a police officer under AS

18.65.240

if that person’s prospective employer does not have access to a criminal justice information system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 50 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 8 SLA 2017; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 7, ch. 35, SLA 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for police officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 1.

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

For definitions, see 13 AAC 85, art. 3.

For certification of police training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 1.

For certification of probation, parole, and correctional officer training p, see 13 AAC 87, art. 2.

For certification of municipal correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 3.

For minimum standards for village police officers, see 13 AAC 89.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective August 17, 2017, in the introductory language at the end of (3), added “the curriculum requirements established under this paragraph must include training in”, added (3)(A) — (D).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 19, 2018, added (8), and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 35, SLA 2018 (SB 148), which amended this section, see 2018 Senate Journal 1772 — 1773.

Sec. 18.65.225.
Alaska police training fund.

The Alaska police training fund is created in the general fund. The fund consists of appropriations made by the legislature to the fund. The legislature may appropriate to the fund the annual estimated balance in the accounts maintained under AS

37.05.142

for money collected under AS

12.25.195(c)

, AS

12.55.039

, AS

28.05.151

, and AS

29.25.074

. The legislature may make appropriations from the fund to (1) the Department of Public Safety for the Public Safety Training Academy, including Village Public Safety Officers, (2) the Alaska Police Standards Council to provide training for the law enforcement and corrections community of the state under AS

18.65.230

, and (3) municipalities that conduct their own police training programs. Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 4 ch 119 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS

29.25.074

” was substituted for “AS

29.25.072

” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 119, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.65.230.
Training programs; criminal history records check.

The council shall establish and maintain police training programs, probation and parole officer training programs, and correctional training programs through those agencies and institutions that the council considers appropriate.

To determine a person’s qualification for appointment as a police officer under AS

18.65.240

, each person who applies for admittance to a basic program of police training established under this section shall submit to the council the person’s fingerprints along with the fee established in AS

12.62.160

unless the person’s fingerprints were previously submitted by the person’s prospective employer. The Department of Public Safety shall conduct a state criminal history record check and may submit the person’s fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history record check of the person under AS

12.62.400

for the purpose of evaluating the person’s qualifications for appointment as a police officer under AS

18.65.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 7, ch. 35, SLA 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for police officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 1.

For certification of police training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 1.

For certification of probation, parole, and correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 2.

For certification of municipal correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 19, 2018, added (b).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 35, SLA 2018 (SB 148), which amended this section, see 2018 Senate Journal 1772 — 1773.

Sec. 18.65.240.
Standards.

A person may not be appointed as a police officer, except on a probationary basis, unless the person (1) has satisfactorily completed a basic program of police training approved by the council, which includes at least 12 hours of instruction regarding domestic violence and at least 12 hours of instruction regarding sexual assault, as those terms are defined in AS

18.66.990

, and (2) possesses other qualifications the council has established for the employment of police officers, including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, moral character, and experience. The council shall prescribe the means of presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements.

Subject to (d) of this section, the council shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of (a) of this section to an applicant who satisfies those requirements or who satisfies the requirements of (a)(2) of this section and satisfactorily completes a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the council for approved police education and training programs in this state.

The council may deny or revoke the certificate of a police officer who does not meet the standards adopted under (a)(2) of this section.

The council may not issue a certificate under (b) of this section to an applicant unless the council determines that the applicant will undergo a national criminal history record check before employment as a police officer. If a prospective employer of a person seeking certification under this section does not have access to a criminal justice information system to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check, the prospective employer shall submit to the council the applicant’s fingerprints along with the fee established in AS

12.62.160

. The council or prospective employer shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety to request a national criminal history record check of the person for the purpose of evaluating the person’s qualifications for appointment as a police officer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am §§ 5, 6 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 24 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 35 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 7, ch. 35, SLA 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for police officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 1.

For definitions, see 13 AAC 85, art. 3.

For certification of police training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 1.

For minimum standards for village police officers, see 13 AAC 89.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, effective September 19, 2018, in (b), substituted “Subject to (d) of this section, the council” for “The council” at the beginning; added (d).

The second 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “and at least 12 hours of instruction regarding sexual assault” and “those terms are” following “regarding domestic violence”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 35, SLA 2018 (SB 148), which amended this section, see 2018 Senate Journal 1772 — 1773.

Sec. 18.65.242.
Standards for municipal correctional, correctional, probation, and parole officers.

The council shall establish qualifications for employment of persons as municipal correctional, correctional, probation, and parole officers, including

minimum age, physical and mental standards, citizenship, moral character, and experience; and

minimum education standards.

The council shall

prescribe the means of presenting evidence of fulfillment of the requirements set out in (a) of this section; and

issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of (a) of this section to an applicant who

satisfies the requirements of (a)(1) of this section; and

meets the minimum education standards of (a)(2) of this section by satisfactorily completing a training program for municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officers established under AS

18.65.230

, including training regarding domestic violence that contains the subjects set out in AS

18.66.310(d)

, or a course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the council for approved municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officer education and training programs in this state.

In the evaluation of applicants against the mental standards developed under (a)(1) of this section, the council shall use evaluation methods that do not discriminate against applicants of different ethnic origins.

History.

(§ 6 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 25 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 4, 5 ch 126 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

For definitions, see 13 AAC 85, art. 3.

For certification of probation, parole, and correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 2.

For certification of municipal correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 3.

Sec. 18.65.245.
Denial or revocation of certificate of municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officer.

The council may

deny a certificate to an applicant for a municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officer certificate if the applicant does not meet the standards adopted by the council under AS

18.65.242(a)

;

revoke the certificate of a municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officer who, having been issued a certificate, fails to meet the standards adopted by the council under AS

18.65.242(a)

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 126 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.248.
Employment of correctional, probation, and parole officers.

A person may not be appointed as a municipal correctional, correctional, probation, or parole officer unless the person has a valid certificate issued by the council under AS

18.65.242

.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a person employed on a probationary basis, except that employment on a probationary basis may not exceed the period authorized for probationary employment determined by the council.

History.

(§ 6 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 126 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 112, SLA 1988 provides:

“(a) Notwithstanding AS

18.65.248

, added by sec. 6 of this Act, a person employed by the state as a correctional, probation, or parole officer on February 9, 1991 may continue to be employed as an officer without a certificate issued by the Alaska Police Standards Council.
The Department of Corrections may not discriminate against a person employed as a correctional, probation, or parole officer under this subsection in any matter relating to the officer’s employment status, wages and benefits payable, promotion and reassignment opportunities, or training necessary to attain certification because the officer does not have a certificate issued by the Alaska Police Standards Council.

“(b) A person continuing in employment under the exemption provided in (a) of this section who terminates that employment after February 9, 1991 may be reemployed by the state as a correctional, probation, or parole officer only if the person holds a valid certificate issued by the Alaska Police Standards Council.”

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with sec. 9(a), ch. 112, SLA 1988, see 1988 House Journal 2395.

Sec. 18.65.250.
Financial assistance. [Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 18.65.260.
Grants.

The council may accept donations of property, both real and personal, and grants of money from a governmental unit or public agency, or from an institution or person. All money received by the council under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the account of the council.

The council shall provide for and administer a funding program authorized in (a) of this section. In the administration of the program the council shall promote the most efficient and economical program for police training, including the maximum utilization of existing facilities and programs to avoid duplication.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For certification of police training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 1.

Sec. 18.65.270.
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act.

AS

18.65.150

—

18.65.290

shall be administered in compliance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for police officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 1.

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

Sec. 18.65.280.
Exemptions.

The commissioner and deputy commissioner of public safety and the chief administrative officers of local police departments are exempt from the requirements of AS

18.65.240

. However, a person appointed chief of a local police department after July 1, 1981, who performs any operational duties, shall meet the requirements of AS

18.65.240

(a)(1).

A political subdivision with an established police training program meeting the requirements of AS

18.65.220

(2) and (3) may exclude itself from the requirements of AS

18.65.240

by ordinance. The exclusion has no effect on eligibility to receive federal or state grants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 19 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1981, in subsection (b), the words “a political subdivision” were substituted for “any local government”.

Sec. 18.65.285.
Municipal correctional employees.

A municipality that employs persons in a municipal correctional facility may, by ordinance, require that those persons meet the requirements of AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

that are applicable to municipal correctional officers.

History.

(§ 7 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 126 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.65.280(c).
Renumbered in 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For minimum standards for probation, parole, and correctional officers, see 13 AAC 85, art. 2.

For definitions, see 13 AAC 85, art. 3.

For certification of municipal correctional officer training programs, see 13 AAC 87, art. 3.

Sec. 18.65.290.
Definitions.

In
AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

,

“chief administrative officer” means a chief of police or other official who is head of a police department in a political subdivision;

“correctional facility” means a prison or jail owned, leased, or operated by the state that is designated by the commissioner of corrections for the custody, care, security, control, and discipline of prisoners;

“correctional officer” means a person

appointed by the commissioner of corrections whose primary duty under AS 33.30 is to provide custody, care, security, control, and discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses against the state or held under authority of state law; or

employed in a correctional facility in this state whose primary duty is to provide custody, care, security, control, and discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses or held under authority of law;

“council” means the Alaska Police Standards Council;

“criminal justice information system” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;

“municipal correctional officer” means a person who is employed full-time in a municipal correctional facility whose primary duty is to provide custody, care, security, control, and discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses or held under authority of law; and the municipality has adopted an ordinance under AS

18.65.285

making AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

applicable;

“parole officer” means a person appointed by the commissioner of corrections or employed by a correctional facility in this state to perform the duties of supervising the parole of prisoners under AS 33.16;

“police officer” means

an employee of the state or a municipal police department with the authority to arrest and issue citations; detain a person taken into custody until that person can be arraigned before a judge or magistrate; conduct investigations of violations of and enforce criminal laws, regulations, and traffic laws; search with or without a warrant persons, dwellings, and other forms of property for evidence of a crime; and take other action consistent with exercise of these enumerated powers when necessary to maintain the public peace;

an officer or employee of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities who is stationed at an international airport and has been designated to have the general police powers authorized under AS

02.15.230(a)

;

a University of Alaska public safety officer with general police powers authorized under AS

14.40.043

;

“probation officer” means a person appointed by the commissioner of corrections or employed by a correctional facility in this state to perform the duties of a probation officer under AS 33.05.

History.

(§ 1 ch 178 SLA 1972; am §§ 10, 11 ch 19 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 112 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 126 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 160 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 2013; am § 6 ch 35 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1986, 1988, 1998, and 2004 to alphabetize the defined terms. Paragraph (5) was enacted as (9); renumbered in 2018, at which time other paragraphs were renumbered to maintain alphabetical consistency.

Administrative Code. —

For definitions, see 13 AAC 85, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 19, 2018, added (9) [now (5)].

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent in connection with the 1989 amendment of this section by § 1,
ch. 71, SLA 1989 (SSSB 110), see 1989 Senate Journal 602.

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 35, SLA 2018 (SB 148), which amended this section, see 2018 Senate Journal 1772 — 1773.

Opinions of attorney general. —

To be a police officer within the meaning of this statute, an officer must be currently working full time for a police department, that is, an organized civil force whose basic purpose and function is to maintain peace and order and to prevent and investigate criminal offenses. September 18, 1977 Op. Att'y Gen.

As applied to the coverage of AS

18.65.130

—

18.65.290

, the term “police officer” is more restrictively defined than the definition in AS

01.10.060

to include all those full-time employees of police departments administered by the state or one of its political subdivisions who have full police duties and the authority to enforce all of the laws of the State of Alaska which carry a penalty for their violation. September 18, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Comparing the classification of “peace officer” in
AS

01.10.060

with that of “police officer,” it is apparent that police officers, as defined in paragraph (3) [now (8)], are always peace officers since they have full police duties that are exercised on a full-time basis. However, the converse of this proposition can never be the case; that is, peace officer status does not automatically vest one with the status of a police officer since peace officers are not necessarily employees of a police department and do not necessarily have the power to enforce all the penal, traffic or highway laws of the state. September 18, 1977 Op. Att'y Gen.

Most Village Public Safety Officers and Village Police Officers are not “police officers” under the definition in paragraph (3) [now (8)]. Whether an individual officer is subject to regulation by the Alaska Police Standards Council depends upon the circumstances of his or her employment and has to be determined on a case-by-case basis. July 1, 1984 Op. Att'y Gen.